Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.100

Initial meeting of shareholders of domestic association—Notice—Proxy voting.

Within twelve months following consummation of the conversion, the directors of a domestic association shall call a meeting of the members for the purpose of electing directors and conducting such other business of the association as is appropriate. Notice of such meeting shall be mailed not less than ten nor more than thirty days in advance of the meeting to the last known address of each member. The notice may also include a proxy form authorizing any one or more persons, who may be directors or officers of the association, selected by the directors, to vote on behalf of any member executing such proxy.

[ 1982 c 3 s 88; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.